District of Columbia statutes.
41-141.01

Unclaimed deposits for excavation work in public space.

This chapter shall not apply to an unclaimed deposit for excavation work in public space. The Mayor may establish, by rule, the standards and procedures for determining whether and when such a deposit will be considered abandoned, and for determining the custody and ownership of such a deposit.

History

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 141a
as added Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 6022, 57 DCR 6242

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 6022 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Short Title

Short title: Section 6021 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle C of title VI of the act may be cited as the “Unclaimed Deposits for Excavation Work Amendment Act of 2010”.